District of Columbia statutes.
29-1115

Admission, suspension, dismissal, or expulsion of member.

(a)

A person shall become a member and may be suspended, dismissed, or expelled in accordance with the association’s governing principles. If there are no applicable governing principles, a person shall become a member or be suspended, dismissed, or expelled from an association only by a vote of its members. A person shall not be admitted as a member without the person’s consent.

(b)

Unless the governing principles provide otherwise, the suspension, dismissal, or expulsion of a member shall not relieve the member from any unpaid capital contribution, dues, assessments, fees, or other obligation incurred, or commitment made, by the member before the suspension, dismissal, or expulsion.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 19 of the Uniform Unincorporated Nonprofit Association Act (2008 Act).